Wyoming statutes. Title 39 Taxation and Revenue
Chapter 23 Tax Upon Production of Electricity From Nuclear Reactors

History.

2020 ch. 104, § 1, effective March 13, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2020, ch. 104, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2020.

§ 39-23-101.
Definitions.

There are no specific applicable provisions for definitions for this chapter.

History.

2020 ch. 104, § 1, effective March 13, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2020, ch. 104, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2020.

§ 39-23-102.
Administration.

The department of revenue shall enforce the provisions of this chapter. The department shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary for the implementation and enforcement of this chapter.

History.

2020 ch. 104, § 1, effective March 13, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2020, ch. 104, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2020.

§ 39-23-103.
Imposition.

There is levied an excise tax upon the sale of electricity from nuclear reactors in this state. The tax shall be imposed upon the sale of any electricity produced from nuclear reactors on or after January 1, 2021 and shall be paid by the person selling such electricity. The tax shall be imposed on each megawatt hour of electricity that is generated from the nuclear reactor and sold.

History.

2020 ch. 104, § 1, effective March 13, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2020, ch. 104, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2020.

§ 39-23-104.
Taxation rate.

The tax rate shall be five dollars ($5.00) on each megawatt hour, or portion thereof, which is sold.

History.

2020 ch. 104, § 1, effective March 13, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2020, ch. 104, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2020.

§ 39-23-105.
Exemptions.

No tax shall be imposed upon electricity which is produced from any generating facility owned or operated by the federal government, state of Wyoming or by any county or municipality in this state.

No tax shall be imposed upon electricity which is produced for the personal consumption of the producer. For purposes of this subsection, “electricity produced for the personal consumption of the producer” shall include any excess production of electricity that does not exceed five hundred (500) kilowatt hours in any twenty-four (24) hour period.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, no tax shall be imposed on any advanced nuclear reactor operated in accordance with W.S.

35-11-2101

. Beginning July 1, 2035, a taxpayer shall only qualify for the exemption authorized under this subsection for any month that not less than eighty percent (80%) of the advanced nuclear reactor’s uranium used for producing electricity was sourced from uranium mines located in the United States. The burden shall be on the taxpayer to establish entitlement to the exemption authorized under this subsection. Not later than June 1 of each year, the department of revenue shall report to the joint revenue interim committee on the amount of taxes that were exempted under this subsection during the prior tax year.

History.

2020 ch. 104, § 1, effective March 13, 2020; 2022 ch. 103, § 1, effective March 21, 2022.

The 2022 amendment

rewrote (c), which read, “No tax shall be imposed on any test or demonstration small modular nuclear reactor licensed and operated in accordance with W.S. 35-11-2101(b) and

35-11-431

through

35-11-433

.”

Laws 2022, ch. 103, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 21, 2022.

Effective date. —

Laws 2020, ch. 104, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2020.

§ 39-23-106.
Licensing; permits.

There are no specific applicable provisions for licenses and permits for this chapter.

History.

2020 ch. 104, § 1, effective March 13, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2020, ch. 104, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2020.

§ 39-23-107.
Compliance; collection procedures.

Returns and reports. Any person producing electricity from nuclear reactors within this state which is subject to the tax imposed by this chapter shall report the amount of megawatt hours produced in this state on or before the fifteenth day of the month immediately following the month in which the electricity was produced.

Payment. Any person owing a tax under this chapter shall pay the tax once each month on or before the fifteenth day of the month immediately following the month in which the electricity was produced. The tax shall be collected by the department of revenue.

Timelines. There are no specific applicable provisions for timelines for this chapter.

History.

2020 ch. 104, § 1, effective March 13, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2020, ch. 104, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2020.

§ 39-23-108.
Enforcement.

Audits. There are no specific applicable provisions for audits for this chapter.

Interest. Interest at an annual rate equal to the average prime interest as determined by the state treasurer during the preceding fiscal year, plus four percent (4%), shall be added to all delinquent taxes under this chapter. To determine the average prime interest rate, the state treasurer shall average the prime interest for at least seventy-five percent (75%) of the thirty (30) largest banks in the United States. The interest rate on delinquent taxes shall be adjusted on January 1 of each year following the year in which the taxes first became delinquent. In no instance shall the delinquent interest rate be less than twelve percent (12%) nor greater than eighteen percent (18%).

Penalties. The following shall apply:

If any person fails to make or file a return and remit the tax as required by W.S.

39-23-107

, the department shall impose a penalty of five percent (5%) of the taxes due for each thirty (30) day period, or fraction thereof, elapsing between the due date of the return and the date filed, unless the person for good cause obtains from the department an extension of time for filing prior to the due date for filing. In the event of an extension, the person shall pay the interest due on delinquent payments set forth in subsection (b) of this section. In no event shall the total penalty imposed by this subsection exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the tax due. The department, for good cause, may waive a penalty imposed for failure to file a return for any one (1) calendar year, provided that:

The return was filed within five (5) business days following the due date, including an approved extension period; and

The taxpayer requests the waiver in writing within fifteen (15) days after the return was filed, setting forth the reasons for the late filing.

If any part of a tax deficiency is due to the negligence or intentional disregard of rules and regulations there shall be added a penalty of five percent (5%) of the amount of the deficiency plus interest as provided by subsection (b) of this section. The taxes, penalty and interest shall be paid by the taxpayer within ten (10) days after receipt of notice and demand by the department;

Taxes due together with interest, penalties and costs shall be collectible by the department by appropriate judicial proceedings;

The department may credit or waive penalties imposed by this section as part of a settlement or for any other good cause.

Liens. Any delinquent tax is a lien upon the property of any owner from and after the time the tax is due until the tax is paid. The tax lien shall have preference over all liens except any valid mortgage or other liens of record filed or recorded prior to the date the tax became due.

Tax sales. There are no specific applicable provisions for tax sales for this chapter.

History.

2020 ch. 104, § 1, effective March 13, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2020, ch. 104, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2020.

§ 39-23-109.
Taxpayer remedies.

Credits. The following shall apply:

The taxpayer is entitled to receive an offsetting credit for any property tax paid in connection with the sale of electricity produced from a nuclear reactor;

Any credit under this subsection may be carried forward to succeeding reporting periods.

History.

2020 ch. 104, § 1, effective March 13, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2020, ch. 104, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2020.

§ 39-23-110.
Statute of limitations.

There are no specific applicable provisions for a statute of limitations for this chapter.

History.

2020 ch. 104, § 1, effective March 13, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2020, ch. 104, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2020.

§ 39-23-111.
Distribution.

One hundred percent (100%) of the proceeds from the tax imposed by this chapter shall be distributed by the department and deposited in the state general fund, with receipt and acknowledgement submitted to the state treasurer.

History.

2020 ch. 104, § 1, effective March 13, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2020, ch. 104, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2020.